District of Columbia statutes.
47-2308

Penalty for accepting fuel from importer without an itemized sale statement.

It shall be unlawful for any person to accept or receive from any importer or distributor, except in cases of retail sales, any motor vehicle fuel unless the statement provided for in § 47-2305 appears upon the invoice for the fuel. If any such motor vehicle fuel is received and accepted by any person upon the invoice of which said statement does not appear, such person shall pay to the Collector of Taxes the tax herein imposed.

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 8
Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 679, ch. 690, title III, § 6
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.
1973 Ed., § 47-1908.
1981 Ed., § 47-2308.